North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-01 Names and Boundaries of Counties
11-01-49.
Towner County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range sixty-eight west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range sixty-five west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range sixty-five west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range sixty-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range sixty-eight west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range sixty-eight west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 37, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0149. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-50.
Traill County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-three west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Red River of the North to the intersection of the main channel of the Red River of the North and the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range fifty-three west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-three and fifty-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range fifty-three west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-three west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-three and fifty-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1875, ch. 32, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0150. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-51.
Walsh County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-five north, range fifty-nine west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-four and one hundred fifty-five north to the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Red River of the North to the point where the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north intersects the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range fifty-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range fifty-nine west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range fifty-nine west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1881, ch. 51, § 1; 1881, ch. 52, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0151. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-52.
Ward County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range eighty-seven west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range eighty-one west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range eighty-one west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range eighty-one west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range eighty-one west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range eighty-one west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range eighty-one west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-seven and one hundred fifty-eight north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-seven west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-six and eighty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty-seven west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-eight west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred sixty-one and one hundred sixty-two north to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-eight and eighty-nine west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-eight west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-nine and ninety west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range eighty-nine west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range eighty-seven west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range eighty-seven west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range eighty-seven west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range eighty-seven west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 50, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 11-0152. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-53.
Wells County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range seventy-three west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range sixty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range sixty-eight west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range sixty-eight west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-seven and sixty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty north, range sixty-eight west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty north, range seventy-three west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range seventy-three west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range seventy-three west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 43, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0153. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-54.
Williams County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north; thence south along the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in an easterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point where the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west of the fifth principal meridian intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range ninety-five west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range ninety-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range ninety-five west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 50, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 11-0154. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.